Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1601
Applicant for service; denial prohibited, when.

No applicant for the services of a public or private utility company furnishing water, natural gas, or electricity at retail in this state shall be denied service because of unpaid bills for similar service which are not collectible at law because of statutes of limitations or discharge in bankruptcy proceedings.

Laws 1972, LB 1201, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 18-417;

Laws 1988, LB 792, § 1.